North Dakota statutes. TITLE 25 Mental and Physical Illness or Disability
CHAPTER 25-03.1 Commitment Procedures

25-03.1-01.
Legislative intent.

The provisions of this chapter are intended by the legislative assembly to:

Provide prompt evaluation and treatment of persons with serious mental disorders or a substance use disorder.

Safeguard individual rights.

Provide continuity of care for persons with serious mental disorders or a substance use disorder.

Encourage the full use of all existing agencies, professional personnel, and public funds to prevent duplication of services and unnecessary expenditures.

Encourage, whenever appropriate, that services be provided within the community.

Source:

S.L. 1977, ch. 239, § 3; 1989, ch. 149, § 2; 2019, ch. 225, § 6, effective August 1, 2019.

Cross-References.

Addiction hospitals, licensing of, see N.D.C.C. ch. 23-17.1.

City or county alcoholic counseling services, see § 5-01-05.4.

Commitment of one found not fit to proceed, see § 12.1-04-08.

Criminal charges, mental disease or defect as defense, temporary commitment, see §§ 12.1-04-04 to 12.1-04-07.

Criminal Responsibility and Post-Trial Responsibility Act, see N.D.C.C. ch. 12.1-04.1.

Cruel treatment of patients a misdemeanor, see § 25-01-16.

Defense of insanity, see N.D.R.Crim.P. 12.2.

Definition of mentally ill individual, see § 25-01-01.

Definition of mentally ill person, see § 25-03.1-02.

Detoxification, detention by peace officer for, see § 5-01-05.1.

Division of alcoholism and drug abuse, see N.D.C.C. ch. 54-38.

Division of mental health and retardation, see N.D.C.C. ch. 25-10.

Fees and expenses, see N.D.C.C. ch. 50-06.3.

Fishing without license permitted, see § 20.1-03-04.

Minors, treatment for alcoholism or drug abuse without parent’s consent, see § 14-10-17.

Notice of defense based on mental condition, see N.D.R.Crim.P. 12.2.

Public institutions, see N.D. Const., Art. IX, §§ 12, 13.

Public intoxication not to be prosecuted, see § 5-01-05.2.

Right of state to establish custody and restraint for persons of unsound mind, see § 54-01-19.

Rights of patients, see §§ 25-02-09, 25-03.1-13, 25-03.1-40, 25-03.1-41.

Special care upon payment therefor, see § 25-02-09.

25-03.1-02.
Definitions. [Effective through August 31, 2022]

In this chapter, unless the context requires otherwise:

“Advanced practice registered nurse” means an individual who is licensed as an advanced practice registered nurse under chapter 43-12.1 within the role of certified nurse practitioner or certified clinical nurse specialist, who has completed the requirements for a minimum of a master’s degree in psychiatric and mental health nursing from an accredited program, and who is functioning within the scope of practice in one of the population foci as approved by the state board of nursing. This chapter does not expand the scope of practice of an advanced practice registered nurse beyond the scope of practice established by the state board of nursing.

“Alternative treatment order” means an involuntary outpatient order for a treatment program, other than hospitalization, which may include treatment with a prescribed medication.

“Consent” means voluntary permission based upon full disclosure of facts necessary to make a decision and which is given by an individual who has the ability to understand those facts.

“Court” means, except when otherwise indicated, the district court serving the county in which the respondent resides.

“Department” means the department of human services.

“Director” means the director of a treatment facility or the director’s designee.

“Expert examiner” means a licensed physician, physician assistant, psychiatrist, psychologist trained in a clinical program, advanced practice registered nurse, or licensed addiction counselor appointed by the court to examine the respondent and to provide an evaluation of whether the respondent is a person requiring treatment.

“Independent expert examiner” means a licensed physician, physician assistant, psychiatrist, psychologist trained in a clinical program, advanced practice registered nurse, or licensed addiction counselor, chosen at the request of the respondent to provide an independent evaluation of whether the respondent is a person requiring treatment.

“Individual with a substance use disorder” means an individual with an illness or disorder characterized by a maladaptive pattern of usage of alcohol or drugs, or a combination thereof, resulting in social, occupational, psychological, or physical problems.

“Magistrate” means the judge of the appropriate district or juvenile court or a judge assigned by the presiding judge of the judicial district.

“Mental health professional” means:

A psychologist with at least a master’s degree who has been either licensed or approved for exemption by the North Dakota board of psychology examiners.

A social worker with a master’s degree in social work from an accredited program.

An advanced practice registered nurse.

A registered nurse with a minimum of two years of psychiatric clinical experience under the supervision of an expert examiner.

A licensed addiction counselor.

A licensed professional counselor with a master’s degree in counseling from an accredited program who has either successfully completed the advanced training beyond the master’s degree as required by the national academy of mental health counselors or a minimum of two years of clinical experience in a mental health agency or setting under the supervision of a psychiatrist or psychologist.

A physician assistant.

“Mentally ill person” or “person who is mentally ill” means an individual with an organic, mental, or emotional disorder that substantially impairs the capacity to use self-control, judgment, and discretion in the conduct of personal affairs and social relations. The term does not include an individual with an intellectual disability of significantly subaverage general intellectual functioning that originates during the developmental period and is associated with impairment in adaptive behavior, although an individual who is intellectually disabled may also be a person who is mentally ill. A substance use disorder does not per se constitute mental illness, although an individual with a substance use disorder may also be a person who is mentally ill.

“Person requiring treatment” means a person who is mentally ill or an individual with a substance use disorder, and there is a reasonable expectation that if the individual is not treated for the mental illness or substance use disorder there exists a serious risk of harm to that individual, others, or property.

“Physician assistant” means an individual licensed to practice as a physician assistant under chapter 43-17, who is authorized by the North Dakota board of medicine to practice in the field of psychiatry, holds a certification in psychiatry approved by the board, and is practicing under the supervision of a psychiatrist licensed to practice medicine in this state. This chapter does not expand the scope of practice of a physician assistant beyond the scope of practice authorized by the North Dakota board of medicine.

“Private treatment facility” means any facility established under chapter 10-19.1 or 10-33 and licensed under chapter 23-16 or 50-31.

“Psychiatrist” means a licensed physician who has completed a residency program in psychiatry.

“Public treatment facility” means any treatment facility not falling under the definition of a private treatment facility.

“Qualified service organization” means a person that provides services to a treatment facility such as data processing, bill collecting, dosage preparation, laboratory analysis, or legal, medical, accounting, or other professional services, and which agrees that in dealing with patient records, that person is bound by the confidentiality restrictions of this chapter, except as otherwise provided for by law.

“Respondent” means an individual subject to petition for involuntary treatment.

“Serious risk of harm” means a substantial likelihood of:

Suicide, as manifested by suicidal threats, attempts, or significant depression relevant to suicidal potential;

Killing or inflicting serious bodily harm on another individual or inflicting significant property damage, as manifested by acts or threats;

Substantial deterioration in physical health, substantial injury, disease, or death, based upon recent poor self-control or judgment in providing one’s shelter, nutrition, or personal care; or

Substantial deterioration in mental health which would predictably result in danger to that individual, others, or property, based upon:

Evidence of objective facts to establish the loss of cognitive or volitional control over the individual’s thoughts or actions; or

Acts or threats; patterns in the individual’s treatment history; the individual’s current condition; and other relevant factors, including the effect of the individual’s mental condition on the individual’s ability to consent.

“Substantial likelihood” may take into account an individual’s history and recent behavior.

“Superintendent” means the state hospital superintendent or the superintendent’s designee.

“Third-party payer” means a person that pays, or agrees to pay, for diagnosis or treatment furnished to a patient on the basis of a contractual relationship with the patient or a member of the patient’s family, or on the basis of the patient’s eligibility for federal, state, or local governmental benefits, and includes any person providing audit or evaluation activities for the third-party payer.

“Treatment facility” or “facility” means any hospital, including the state hospital at Jamestown, or any evaluation and treatment facility that provides directly, or by direct arrangement with other public or private agencies, emergency evaluation and treatment, outpatient care, and inpatient care to a person who is mentally ill or a person who has a substance use disorder.

Source:

S.L. 1977, ch. 239, § 1; 1979, ch. 334, § 4; 1981, ch. 320, § 45; 1983, ch. 314, § 1; 1983, ch. 315, § 1; 1985, ch. 147, § 22; 1985, ch. 308, § 1; 1987, ch. 536, § 2; 1989, ch. 149, § 3; 1991, ch. 292, § 2; 1991, ch. 293, §§ 1, 2; 1991, ch. 326, § 71; 1993, ch. 279, § 1; 1999, ch. 50, § 41; 2003, ch. 224, § 1; 2003, ch. 432, § 1; 2005, ch. 248, § 1; 2009, ch. 238, § 1; 2009, ch. 239, § 1; 2011, ch. 207, § 6; 2015, ch. 201, § 1, effective August 1, 2015; 2019, ch. 225, § 7, effective August 1, 2019; 2019, ch. 226, § 1, effective August 1, 2019.

25-03.1-02.
Definitions. [Effective September 1, 2022]

In this chapter, unless the context requires otherwise:

“Advanced practice registered nurse” means an individual who is licensed as an advanced practice registered nurse under chapter 43-12.1 within the role of certified nurse practitioner or certified clinical nurse specialist, who has completed the requirements for a minimum of a master’s degree in psychiatric and mental health nursing from an accredited program, and who is functioning within the scope of practice in one of the population foci as approved by the state board of nursing. This chapter does not expand the scope of practice of an advanced practice registered nurse beyond the scope of practice established by the state board of nursing.

“Alternative treatment order” means an involuntary outpatient order for a treatment program, other than hospitalization, which may include treatment with a prescribed medication.

“Consent” means voluntary permission based upon full disclosure of facts necessary to make a decision and which is given by an individual who has the ability to understand those facts.

“Court” means, except when otherwise indicated, the district court serving the county in which the respondent resides.

“Department” means the department of health and human services.

“Director” means the director of a treatment facility or the director’s designee.

“Expert examiner” means a licensed physician, physician assistant, psychiatrist, psychologist trained in a clinical program, advanced practice registered nurse, or licensed addiction counselor appointed by the court to examine the respondent and to provide an evaluation of whether the respondent is a person requiring treatment.

“Independent expert examiner” means a licensed physician, physician assistant, psychiatrist, psychologist trained in a clinical program, advanced practice registered nurse, or licensed addiction counselor, chosen at the request of the respondent to provide an independent evaluation of whether the respondent is a person requiring treatment.

“Individual with a substance use disorder” means an individual with an illness or disorder characterized by a maladaptive pattern of usage of alcohol or drugs, or a combination thereof, resulting in social, occupational, psychological, or physical problems.

“Magistrate” means the judge of the appropriate district or juvenile court or a judge assigned by the presiding judge of the judicial district.

“Mental health professional” means:

A psychologist with at least a master’s degree who has been either licensed or approved for exemption by the North Dakota board of psychology examiners.

A social worker with a master’s degree in social work from an accredited program.

An advanced practice registered nurse.

A registered nurse with a minimum of two years of psychiatric clinical experience under the supervision of an expert examiner.

A licensed addiction counselor.

A licensed professional counselor with a master’s degree in counseling from an accredited program who has either successfully completed the advanced training beyond the master’s degree as required by the national academy of mental health counselors or a minimum of two years of clinical experience in a mental health agency or setting under the supervision of a psychiatrist or psychologist.

A physician assistant.

“Mentally ill person” or “person who is mentally ill” means an individual with an organic, mental, or emotional disorder that substantially impairs the capacity to use self-control, judgment, and discretion in the conduct of personal affairs and social relations. The term does not include an individual with an intellectual disability of significantly subaverage general intellectual functioning that originates during the developmental period and is associated with impairment in adaptive behavior, although an individual who is intellectually disabled may also be a person who is mentally ill. A substance use disorder does not per se constitute mental illness, although an individual with a substance use disorder may also be a person who is mentally ill.

“Person requiring treatment” means a person who is mentally ill or an individual with a substance use disorder, and there is a reasonable expectation that if the individual is not treated for the mental illness or substance use disorder there exists a serious risk of harm to that individual, others, or property.

“Physician assistant” means an individual licensed to practice as a physician assistant under chapter 43-17, who is authorized by the North Dakota board of medicine to practice in the field of psychiatry, holds a certification in psychiatry approved by the board, and is practicing under the supervision of a psychiatrist licensed to practice medicine in this state. This chapter does not expand the scope of practice of a physician assistant beyond the scope of practice authorized by the North Dakota board of medicine.

“Private treatment facility” means any facility established under chapter 10-19.1 or 10-33 and licensed under chapter 23-16 or 50-31.

“Psychiatrist” means a licensed physician who has completed a residency program in psychiatry.

“Public treatment facility” means any treatment facility not falling under the definition of a private treatment facility.

“Qualified service organization” means a person that provides services to a treatment facility such as data processing, bill collecting, dosage preparation, laboratory analysis, or legal, medical, accounting, or other professional services, and which agrees that in dealing with patient records, that person is bound by the confidentiality restrictions of this chapter, except as otherwise provided for by law.

“Respondent” means an individual subject to petition for involuntary treatment.

“Serious risk of harm” means a substantial likelihood of:

Suicide, as manifested by suicidal threats, attempts, or significant depression relevant to suicidal potential;

Killing or inflicting serious bodily harm on another individual or inflicting significant property damage, as manifested by acts or threats;

Substantial deterioration in physical health, substantial injury, disease, or death, based upon recent poor self-control or judgment in providing one’s shelter, nutrition, or personal care; or

Substantial deterioration in mental health which would predictably result in danger to that individual, others, or property, based upon:

Evidence of objective facts to establish the loss of cognitive or volitional control over the individual’s thoughts or actions; or

Acts or threats; patterns in the individual’s treatment history; the individual’s current condition; and other relevant factors, including the effect of the individual’s mental condition on the individual’s ability to consent.

“Substantial likelihood” may take into account an individual’s history and recent behavior.

“Superintendent” means the state hospital superintendent or the superintendent’s designee.

“Third-party payer” means a person that pays, or agrees to pay, for diagnosis or treatment furnished to a patient on the basis of a contractual relationship with the patient or a member of the patient’s family, or on the basis of the patient’s eligibility for federal, state, or local governmental benefits, and includes any person providing audit or evaluation activities for the third-party payer.

“Treatment facility” or “facility” means any hospital, including the state hospital at Jamestown, or any evaluation and treatment facility that provides directly, or by direct arrangement with other public or private agencies, emergency evaluation and treatment, outpatient care, and inpatient care to a person who is mentally ill or a person who has a substance use disorder.

Source:

S.L. 1977, ch. 239, § 1; 1979, ch. 334, § 4; 1981, ch. 320, § 45; 1983, ch. 314, § 1; 1983, ch. 315, § 1; 1985, ch. 147, § 22; 1985, ch. 308, § 1; 1987, ch. 536, § 2; 1989, ch. 149, § 3; 1991, ch. 292, § 2; 1991, ch. 293, §§ 1, 2; 1991, ch. 326, § 71; 1993, ch. 279, § 1; 1999, ch. 50, § 41; 2003, ch. 224, § 1; 2003, ch. 432, § 1; 2005, ch. 248, § 1; 2009, ch. 238, § 1; 2009, ch. 239, § 1; 2011, ch. 207, § 6; 2015, ch. 201, § 1, effective August 1, 2015; 2019, ch. 225, § 7, effective August 1, 2019; 2019, ch. 226, § 1, effective August 1, 2019; 2021, ch. 352, § 277, effective September 1, 2022.

25-03.1-03.
Jurisdiction.

The district courts have original jurisdiction over the proceedings governed by this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 1977, ch. 239, § 2; 1979, ch. 334, § 6; 1981, ch. 320, § 46; 1983, ch. 315, § 2; 1991, ch. 326, § 72.

25-03.1-03.1.
Disclosure of health information.

A treating facility or mental health professional may disclose individually identifiable health information to a court, regional human service center, state’s attorney, appointed counsel, retained counsel, or other mental health professional, including an expert examiner, and the disclosure is a disclosure for treatment, including the provision, coordination, and management of health care and to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 225, § 1; 2021, ch. 222, § 1, effective August 1, 2021.

25-03.1-04.
Screening and admission to a public treatment facility.

Under rules adopted by the department, screening of an individual to a public treatment facility for observation, diagnosis, care, or treatment for mental illness or a substance use disorder must be performed, in person when reasonably practicable, by a regional human service center. This screening must be performed in the region where the individual is physically located. Upon the request of a court, a law enforcement official, a mental health professional, the individual’s legal guardian, a minor’s parent or legal custodian, or the individual requesting services, the regional human service center shall conduct a screening. If a request for screening is made by a mental health professional and the individual who is the subject of the screening does not authorize the disclosure of the individual’s protected health information, upon the request of the regional human service center, any mental health professional who treated the individual within the previous six months shall disclose, subject to the requirements of title 42, Code of Federal Regulations, part 2, to the human service center any relevant protected health information regarding that treatment. Upon receipt of the request, the regional human service center shall arrange for a screening of the individual and, if appropriate, shall treat the applicant or refer the applicant to the appropriate treatment facility. Upon admittance to a public treatment facility, the superintendent or director shall immediately designate a tier 1 or tier 2 mental health professional to examine the individual.

Source:

S.L. 1977, ch. 239, § 4; 1979, ch. 334, § 8; 1989, ch. 149, § 4; 1989, ch. 335, § 2; 1993, ch. 279, § 2; 1999, ch. 34, § 7; 2003, ch. 226, § 1; 2009, ch. 239, § 2; 2015, ch. 201, § 2, effective August 1, 2015; 2017, ch. 97, § 20, effective August 1, 2017; 2019, ch. 225, § 8, effective August 1, 2019.

25-03.1-05.
Discharge of voluntary patients.

Any voluntary patient who has recovered, or whose treatment the superintendent or director determines is no longer advisable, must be discharged. If, upon discharge, it is determined that the individual would benefit from the receipt of further treatment, the superintendent or director shall offer the individual appropriate treatment on a voluntary basis or shall aid the individual to obtain treatment from another source on a voluntary basis. With the patient’s consent, appropriate referrals may be made for the patient.

Source:

S.L. 1977, ch. 239, § 5; 1979, ch. 334, § 9.

25-03.1-06.
Right to release on application — Exception — Judicial proceedings.

An individual voluntarily admitted for inpatient treatment to a treatment facility or the state hospital must be orally advised of the right to release and must be further advised in writing of the rights under this chapter. A voluntary patient who requests release must be immediately released. However, if the superintendent or the director determines the patient is a person requiring treatment, the release may be postponed until a petition for involuntary commitment has been filed with the clerk of court and judicial proceedings for involuntary treatment have been held in the county in which the hospital or facility is located. The patient must be served the petition within twenty-four hours, exclusive of weekends and holidays, from the time release is requested, unless extended by the magistrate for good cause shown. The treatment hearing must be held within seven days from the time the petition is served.

Source:

S.L. 1977, ch. 239, § 6; 1979, ch. 334, § 10; 1989, ch. 149, § 5; 2015, ch. 201, § 3, effective August 1, 2015; 2021, ch. 222, § 2, effective August 1, 2021.

25-03.1-07.
Involuntary admission standards.

An individual may not be involuntarily admitted under this chapter to the state hospital or another treatment facility unless it is determined the individual is a person requiring treatment.

Source:

S.L. 1977, ch. 239, § 7; 1989, ch. 149, § 6; 2015, ch. 201, § 4, effective August 1, 2015; 2019, ch. 226, § 2, effective August 1, 2019.

25-03.1-08.
Application to state’s attorney or retained attorney — Petition for involuntary treatment — Investigation by mental health professional.

An individual eighteen years of age or over shall present, in good faith, the information necessary for the commitment of an individual for involuntary treatment to the state’s attorney of the county in which the respondent is presently located, or which is the respondent’s place of residence, or to an attorney retained by the petitioner to represent the petitioner throughout the proceedings. The attorney shall assist the petitioner in completing the petition. The petition must be verified by affidavit of the petitioner and contain assertions that the respondent is a person requiring the treatment; the facts, in detail, that are the basis of that assertion; the names, telephone numbers, and addresses, if known, of any witnesses to those facts; and, if known, the name, telephone number, and address of the nearest relative or guardian of the respondent, or, if none, of a friend of the respondent.

The petition may be accompanied by any of the following:

A written statement supporting the petition from a tier 1 mental health professional or an addiction counselor who is practicing within the professional scope of practice and who has personally examined the respondent within forty-five days of the date of the petition.

One or more supporting affidavits otherwise corroborating the petition.

In assisting the petitioner in completing the petition, the state’s attorney may direct a tier 1 or tier 2 mental health professional designated by the regional human service center to investigate and evaluate the specific facts alleged by the petitioner. The investigation must be completed as promptly as possible and include observations of and conversation with the respondent, unless the respondent cannot be found or refuses to meet with the mental health professional. A written report of the results of the investigation must be delivered to the state’s attorney. Copies of the report must be made available upon request to the respondent, the respondent’s counsel, and any expert examiner conducting an examination under section 25-03.1-11. The state’s attorney or retained attorney shall file the petition if the information provided by the petitioner or gathered by investigation provides probable cause to believe the subject of the petition is a person requiring treatment. A state’s attorney who determines there are insufficient grounds for filing a petition may refer the individual to other community resources. A state’s attorney’s decision not to institute proceedings may be reviewed under section 11-16-06.

Source:

S.L. 1977, ch. 239, § 8; 1979, ch. 334, § 11; 1989, ch. 149, § 7; 1993, ch. 279, § 3; 2009, ch. 239, § 3; 2015, ch. 201, § 5, effective August 1, 2015; 2017, ch. 97, § 21, effective August 1, 2017; 2021, ch. 222, § 3, effective August 1, 2021.

25-03.1-09.
Review of petition for involuntary treatment — Probable cause established — Respondent notified — Rights.

Upon the filing of a petition for involuntary treatment, the clerk of court shall immediately notify the magistrate who shall review the petition and accompanying documentation to determine whether it complies with requirements of section 25-03.1-08 and whether it establishes probable cause to believe the respondent is a person requiring treatment. If probable cause has not been so established, the petition must be dismissed unless an amendment would cure the defect.

If probable cause has been established, the magistrate shall cause to be served on the respondent and the respondent’s nearest relative or guardian or, if none, a friend of the respondent:

A copy of the petition and supporting documentation.

A notice informing the respondent of the procedures required by this chapter.

A notice of the respondent’s right to a preliminary and a treatment hearing when in custody under section 25-03.1-25 and if mental illness or a combination of mental illness and a substance use disorder of the respondent is alleged in the petition, or, if not in custody or if in custody and a substance use disorder alone is alleged in the petition, the right to a treatment hearing; of the right to be present at the hearings; of the right to have counsel before the hearings and any court-ordered examination; of the right to an independent evaluation; and, if the respondent is indigent, of the right to counsel and to an independent expert examiner, each at the expense of the county which is the respondent’s place of residence.

Notice that if an independent expert examiner is to be appointed, the respondent must be given an opportunity to select that examiner.

Source:

S.L. 1977, ch. 239, § 9; 1979, ch. 334, § 12; 1989, ch. 149, § 8; 1993, ch. 279, § 4; 2019, ch. 225, § 9, effective August 1, 2019.

25-03.1-10.
Involuntary treatment — Court-ordered examination.

If the petition is not accompanied by a written supportive statement of a tier 1 mental health professional or a licensed addiction counselor who has examined the respondent within the last forty-five days, the court shall order the respondent be examined by an expert examiner of the respondent’s own choice or one appointed by the court. The order must state the date and time within which the respondent must appear; the address to which the respondent is to report; a statement that if the respondent fails to appear at the appointed place at or before the ordered date and time, the respondent may be involuntarily taken into custody and transported to the appointed place; and a statement the expert examiner may consult with or request participation in the examination by a mental health professional and may include with the written examination report any findings or observations by that mental health professional. Accompanying the order must be an explanation of the intended uses and possible effects of this examination. The examination may be conducted at a treatment facility, at the respondent’s home, or at any other suitable place in the community. A request for examination at the state hospital must be screened and approved by a regional human service center. The respondent may be accompanied by one or more relatives or friends at the place of the examination. The costs of the court-ordered examination must be borne by the county that is the respondent’s place of residence.

Source:

S.L. 1977, ch. 239, § 10; 1979, ch. 334, § 13; 1993, ch. 279, § 5; 2003, ch. 225, § 2; 2009, ch. 239, § 4; 2015, ch. 201, § 6, effective August 1, 2015; 2017, ch. 97, § 22, effective August 1, 2017.

25-03.1-10.1.
Use of telemedicine technology authorized.

For purposes of court-ordered examinations conducted under this chapter, an expert examiner may use telemedicine technologies to assist the expert examiner in conducting those examinations.

Source:

S.L. 2011, ch. 203, § 1.

25-03.1-11.
Involuntary treatment — Examination — Report.

The respondent must be examined within a reasonable time by an expert examiner as ordered by the court. If the respondent is taken into custody under the emergency treatment provisions of this chapter, the examination must be conducted within the time limitations set forth in section 25-03.1-26. Any expert examiner conducting an examination under this section may consult with or request participation in the examination by any mental health professional and may include with the written examination report any findings or observations by that mental health professional. This examination report, and that of the independent examiner, if one has been requested, must be filed with the court and immediately sent to the petitioner and the respondent. The report must contain:

Evaluations of the respondent’s physical condition and mental status.

A conclusion as to whether the respondent is a person requiring treatment, with a clear explanation of how that conclusion was derived from the evaluation.

If the report concludes the respondent is a person requiring treatment, a list of available forms of care and treatment that may serve as alternatives to involuntary hospitalization.

The signature of the examiner who prepared the report.

For purposes of any examination conducted pursuant to this section:

An evaluation of a respondent’s physical condition may be made only by a tier 1b mental health professional.

An evaluation of a respondent’s mental status may be made only by a tier 1 mental health professional.

An evaluation of whether the respondent is an individual with a substance use disorder may be made only by a tier 1 mental health professional or a licensed addiction counselor.

If the expert examiner concludes the respondent is not a person requiring treatment, the court may without taking any other additional action terminate the proceedings and dismiss the petition. If the expert examiner concludes the respondent is a person requiring treatment, or makes no conclusion whether the respondent is a person requiring treatment, the court shall set a date for hearing and shall give notice of hearing to the persons designated in section 25-03.1-12. If the respondent is in custody and is alleged to be a person who is mentally ill or a person who is both mentally ill and has a substance use disorder, the preliminary hearing date must be within four days, exclusive of weekends and holidays, of the date the respondent was taken into custody through emergency commitment under section 25-03.1-25 unless a delay or continuance is concurred in by the respondent or unless extended by the magistrate for good cause shown. If a preliminary hearing is not required, the treatment hearing must be held within four days, exclusive of weekends and holidays, of the date the court received the expert examiner’s report, not to exceed fourteen days from the time the petition was served.

Source:

S.L. 1977, ch. 239, § 11; 1979, ch. 334, § 14; 1989, ch. 149, § 9; 1993, ch. 279, § 6; 2003, ch. 227, § 1; 2009, ch. 238, § 2; 2011, ch. 204, § 1; 2015, ch. 201, § 7, effective August 1, 2015; 2017, ch. 350, § 2, effective August 1, 2017; 2017, ch. 97, § 23, effective August 1, 2017; 2021, ch. 223, § 1, effective August 1, 2021.

25-03.1-11.1.
Combination of preliminary and treatment hearings.

With the consent of the court, the parties may waive the preliminary hearing and conduct the treatment hearing within the time period set for the preliminary hearing.

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 149, § 10.

25-03.1-12.
Notice of hearings.

The court shall cause notice of a petition and of the time and place of any hearings under this chapter to be given to the respondent; the respondent’s parents, if a minor; the respondent’s attorney; the petitioner; the state’s attorney; the superintendent or the director of any hospital or treatment facility in which the respondent is hospitalized or is being treated; the spouse of the respondent, if the spouse’s whereabouts is known; the guardian, if any, of the respondent; and such other relatives or persons as the court may determine. The notice must be given at the earliest possible time and sufficiently in advance of the hearing date to permit preparation for the hearing.

Source:

S.L. 1977, ch. 239, § 12.

25-03.1-13.
Right to counsel — Indigency — Waiver — Recoupment — Limitations.

Every respondent under this chapter is entitled to legal counsel. The counsel has access to the respondent’s medical records upon proof of representation.

Unless an appearance has been entered on behalf of the respondent, the court shall, within twenty-four hours, exclusive of weekends or holidays, from the time the petition was filed, appoint counsel to represent the respondent. If a respondent retains counsel, the retained counsel shall immediately notify the court of that fact.

If, after consultation with counsel, the respondent wants to waive the right to counsel or the right to any of the hearings provided for under this chapter, the respondent may do so by notifying the court in writing. The notification must clearly state the respondent’s reasons for the waiver and must also be signed by counsel.

If the court determines that the respondent is indigent, the court shall order that appointed counsel be compensated from county funds of the county that is the respondent’s place of residence in a reasonable amount based upon time and expenses. After notice and hearing, the court may order a respondent with appointed counsel to reimburse the county for expenditures made on the respondent’s behalf.

If the state’s attorney of a county that has expended sums under subsection 4 on behalf of a respondent who is liable to reimburse the county determines that the respondent may have funds or property to reimburse the county, the state’s attorney shall seek civil recovery of those sums. Commencement of the action must occur within six years after the date the sums were paid.

Source:

S.L. 1977, ch. 239, § 13; 1979, ch. 334, § 15; 1989, ch. 149, § 11; 1993, ch. 279, § 7; 2003, ch. 225, § 3.

25-03.1-14.
Duty of state’s attorney in court proceedings.

Unless the petitioner has retained an attorney, the state’s attorney for the county in which proceedings under this chapter are initiated shall appear and represent the state in all court proceedings and hearings. The state’s attorney or an attorney retained by the petitioner need not appear at proceedings initiated by the state hospital under sections 25-03.1-23 and 25-03.1-26. The county of residence of the respondent shall bear the cost of the state’s attorney in such proceedings in a reasonable amount based upon time and expenses.

Source:

S.L. 1977, ch. 239, § 14; 1979, ch. 334, § 16; 1989, ch. 149, § 12.

25-03.1-15.
Respondent’s attendance at hearings.

The respondent must be present at all hearings unless the respondent waives the right to be present either orally or in writing. A respondent’s refusal to attend a hearing is presumed to be a waiver of the right to be present at the hearing. The judge must be notified if the respondent has been medicated within twenty-four hours of the beginning of the hearing or an adjourned session of the hearing, and of the probable effects of the medication.

Source:

S.L. 1977, ch. 239, § 15; 2021, ch. 222, § 4, effective August 1, 2021.

25-03.1-16.
Medication pending treatment order.

A patient who has requested release or an individual who is the subject of a petition for treatment has the right to refuse medication and other forms of treatment before the preliminary or treatment hearing. However, a physician, a physician assistant, or an advanced practice registered nurse may prescribe medication or a less restrictive alternative if it is necessary to prevent bodily harm to the respondent or others or to prevent imminent deterioration of the respondent’s physical or mental condition. The patient has the right to be free of the effects of medication at the preliminary or treatment hearing by discontinuance of medication no later than twenty-four hours before the hearing unless, in the opinion of the prescriber, the need for the medication still exists or discontinuation would hamper the respondent’s preparation for and participation in the proceedings.

Source:

S.L. 1977, ch. 239, § 16; 1979, ch. 334, § 17; 1993, ch. 279, § 8; 2015, ch. 201, § 8, effective August 1, 2015.